tr: Giysi aksesuar malzemesi: Çuval bezi; Tuval; Pamuk; Kot; Sahte kürk; Suni deri; Keçe; Yapağı; Köpük; Deri; Keten; Ağ; Metal; Mikrofiber; Plastik; Plastik; Poliyester; Poliüretan (PU); Polivinil klorür (PVC); Kauçuk; Saten; Silikon; İpek; Sentetik; Tüvit; Kadife; Vinil; Ahşap; Yünlüler; Diğer
es: Material de los accesorios de ropa: Arpillera; Lienzo; Algodón; Vaquera; Piel sintética; Cuero sintético; Fieltro; Vellón; Espuma; Cuero; Lino; Malla; Metal; Microfibra; Nylon; Plástico; Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Goma; Satinado; Silicona; Seda; Sintético; Tweed; Terciopelo; Vinilo; Madera; Lana; Otros
zh-TW: 服裝配飾材質: 粗麻布; 帆布; 棉布; 牛仔布; 人造毛皮; 人造皮; 毛氈; 刷毛布; 泡棉; 皮製; 亞麻; 網布; 金屬; 超細纖維; 尼龍; 塑膠; 聚酯; 聚氨酯 (PU); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 橡膠; 緞面布; 矽膠; 絲綢; 合成; 花呢; 天鵝絨; 乙烯基; 木材; 羊毛; 其他
hu: Ruházati kiegészítő anyaga: Zsákvászon; Vászon; Pamutszövet; Farmer; Műszőrme; Műbőr; Filc; Gyapjú; Hab; Bőr; Lenvászon; Háló; Fém; Mikroszálas; Nejlon; Műanyag; Poliészter; Poliuretán (PU); Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Gumi; Szatén; Szilikon; Selyem; Szintetikus; Tweed gyapjúszövet; Bársony; Vinil; Fa; Gyapjú; Egyéb
ko: 의류 액세서리 소재: 삼베; 캔버스; 면; 데님; 인조 모피; 인조 가죽; 펠트; 플리스; 거품; 가죽; 린넨; 메쉬; 금속; 극세사; 나일론; 플라스틱; 폴리에스테르; 폴리우레탄(PU); 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 고무; 새틴; 실리콘; 실크; 인조; 트위드; 벨벳; 비닐; 목재; 울; 기타
fr: Matériau de l’accessoire vestimentaire: Burlap; Toiles; Coton; Jean; Fausse fourrure; Faux cuir; Feutre; Polaire; Mousse; Cuir; Lin; A mailles; Métal; Microfibre; Nylon; Plastique; Polyester; Polyuréthane (PU); Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Caoutchouc; Satiné; Silicone; Soie; Synthétique; Tweed; Velours; Vinyl; Bois; Laine; Autre
lt-LT: Aprangos aksesuaro medžiaga: Burlapas; Drobė; Medvilnė; Džinsinis audinys; Dirbtinis kailis; Dirbtinė oda; Veltinis; Flisas; Porolonas; Oda; Lininis audinys; Tinklelis; Metalas; Mikropluoštas; Nailonas; Plastikas; Poliesteris; Poliuretanas (PU); Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Kaučiukas; Satinas; Silikonas; Šilkas; Sintetinis; Tvido audinys; Aksomas; Vinilas; Mediena; Vilna; Kita
cs: Materiál oděvního doplňku: Pytlovina; Plátno; Bavlna; Džínovina; Nepravá kožešina; Nepravá kůže; Plst; Flís; Pěna; Kůže; Len; Síťovina; Kov; Mikrovlákno; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Guma; Satén; Silikon; Hedvábí; Syntetické; Tvíd; Samet; Vinylové; Dřevo; Vlna; Jiné
fi: Vaatetarvikkeiden materiaali: Säkkikangas; Kanvaasi; Puuvilla; Denim; Tekoturkis; Keinonahka; Huopa; Fleece; Vaahto; Nahka; Pellava; Verkko; Metalli; Mikrokuitu; Nailon; Muovi; Polyesteri; Polyuretaani (PU); Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Kumi; Satiini; Silikoni; Silkki; Synteettinen; Tweed; Sametti; Vinyyli; Puu; Villa; Muu
sv: Kläder tillbehör - material: Säckväv; Kanvas; Bomull; Denim; Fuskpäls; Fuskläder; Filt; Fleece; Skum; Läder; Linne; Mesh; Metall; Mikrofiber; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Satin; Silikon; Silke; Syntetisk; Tweed; Sammet; Vinyl; Trä; Ylle; Övrigt
pl: Materiał akcesorium do ubrań: Juta; Płótno; Bawełna; Drelich; Sztuczne futro; Skaj; Filc; Polar; Piana; Skórzane; Bielizna pościelowa; Siatka; Metal; Mikrofibra; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Guma; Satyna; Silikon; Jedwab; Syntetyczne; Tweed; Aksamit; Winyl; Drewno; Wełna; Inne
bg-BG: Материал на аксесоарите за облекло: Чул; Брезент; Памук; Деним; Изкуствена козина; Изкуствена кожа; Филц; Полар; Пяна; Кожа; Лен; Мрежа; Метал; Микрофибър; Найлон; Пластмаса; Полиестер; Полиуретан (PU); Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Каучук; Сатен; Силикон; Коприна; Синтетичен; Туид; Кадифе; Винил; Дърво; Вълна; Други
it: Materiale accessorio per abbigliamento: Iuta; Tela; Cotone; Denim; Pelliccia ecologica; Ecopelle; Feltro; Felpa; Schiuma; Pelle; Lino; Mesh; Metallo; Microfibra; Nylon; Plastica; Poliestere; Poliuretano (PU); Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Gomma; Satinato; Silicone; Seta; Sintetico; Tweed; Velluto; Vinile; Legno; Lana; Altro
de: Material des Bekleidungszubehörs: Juteleinen; Leinwand; Baumwolle; Denim; Kunstpelz; Kunstleder; Filz; Vlies; Schaumstoff; Leder; Leinen; Netz; Metall; Mikrofaser; Nylon; Kunststoff; Polyester; Polyurethan (PU); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Gummi; Seidenmatt; Silikon; Seide; Synthetisch; Tweed; Samt; Vinyl; Holz; Wolle; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Materiál doplnkov oblečenia: Vrecovina; Plátno; Bavlna; Denim; Umelá kožušina; Umelá koža; Plsť; Flís; Pena; Koža; Ľan; Sieťovina; Kov; Mikrovlákno; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polyuretán (PU); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Guma; Satén; Silikón; Hodváb; Syntetický; Tvíd; Zamat; Vinyl; Drevo; Vlna; Iné
vi: Vật liệu phụ kiện quần áo: Vải bố; Toan; Vải bông; Bò; Lông thú giả; Da giả; Nỉ; Nỉ cào; Bọt xốp; Da; Lanh; Lưới; Kim loại; Vải xơ vi mảnh; Nylon; Nhựa; Polyester; Polyurethane (PU); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Cao su; Satin; Silicon; Lụa; Tổng hợp; Vải tuýt; Nhung; Nhựa vinyl; Gỗ; Len; Khác
hr-HR: Materijal odjevnog dodatka: Burlap; Platno; Pamuk; Traper; Umjetno krzno; Umjetna koža; Filc; Flis; Pjena; Koža; Lan; Mrežica; Metal; Mikrovlakna; Najlon; Plastika; Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Polivinil klorid (PVC); Guma; Saten; Silikon; Svila; Sintetika; Tvid; Baršun; Vinil; Drvo; Vuna; Ostalo
ja: 衣類アクセサリー素材: バーラップ; キャンバス; コットン; デニム; フェイクファー; フェイクレザー; フェルト; フリース; フォーム; レザー; リネン; メッシュ; 金属; マイクロファイバー; ナイロン; プラスチック; ポリエステル; ポリウレタン (PU); ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); ゴム; サテン; シリコーン; シルク; 合成品; ツイード; ベルベット; ビニール; 木材; ウール; その他
da: Materiale til tilbehør til tøj: Jute; Lærred; Bomuld; Denim; Kunstskind; Kunstigt læder; Filt; Fleece; Skum; Læder; Linned; Mesh; Metal; Mikrofiber; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polyurethan (PU); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Satin; Silikone; Silke; Syntetisk; Tweed; Fløjl; Vinyl; Træ; Uld; Andet
ro-RO: Material accesoriu îmbrăcăminte: Burlap; Pânză; Bumbac; Denim; Blană artificială; Imitație de piele; Pâslă; Polar; Spumă; Piele; In; Plasă; Metal; Microfiber; Nailon; Plastic; Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Cauciuc; Satin; Silicon; Mătase; Sintetic; Tweed; Catifea; Vinyl; Lemn; Lână; Altele
nb: Klestilbehørsmateriale: Jute; Lerret; Bomull; Denim; Fuskepels; Kunstig lær; Filt; Fleece; Skum; Skinn; Lin; Mesh; Metall; Mikrofiber; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Sateng; Silikon; Silke; Syntetisk; Tweed; Fløyel; Vinyl; Trevirke; Ull; Annet
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเครื่องประดับเสื้อผ้า: ผ้าป่าน; ผ้าใบ; สำลี; ผ้าเดนิม; ขนเทียม; หนังเทียม; ผ้าสักหลาด; ผ้าขนแกะ; โฟม; หนัง; ผ้าลินิน; ตาข่าย; โลหะ; ไมโครไฟเบอร์; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลิยูรีเทน (PU); โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); ยาง; กระดาษเนื้อซาติน; ซิลิโคน; ผ้าไหม; สังเคราะห์; ผ้าทวีด; ผ้ากำมะหยี่; ไวนิล; ไม้; ผ้าขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
en: Clothing accessory material: Burlap; Canvas; Cotton; Denim; Faux fur; Faux leather; Felt; Fleece; Foam; Leather; Linen; Mesh; Metal; Microfiber; Nylon; Plastic; Polyester; Polyurethane (PU); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Rubber; Satin; Silicone; Silk; Synthetic; Tweed; Velvet; Vinyl; Wood; Wool; Other
ru: Материал аксессуара для одежды: Мешковина; Холщовая ткань; Хлопок; Деним; Искусственный мех; Искусственная кожа; Фетр; Флис; Поролон; Кожа; Лен; Сетка; Металл; Микрофибра; Нейлон; Пластик; Полиэстер; Полиуретан (ПУ); Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Резина; Сатин; Силикон; Шелк; Синтетика; Твид; Бархат; Винил; Дерево; Шерсть; Другое
pt-BR: Material de acessórios de roupas: Serapilheira; Tela; Algodão; Jeans; Pele sintetica; Couro falso; Sentido; Lã; Espuma; Couro; Linho; Malha; Metal; Microfibra; Nylon; Plástico; Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Borracha; Cetim; Silicone; Seda; Sintético; Tweed; Veludo; Vinil; Madeira; Lã; Outro
el: Υλικό αξεσουάρ ένδυσης: Λινάτσα; Καμβάς; Βαμβάκι; Ντένιμ; Συνθετική γούνα; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Τσόχα; Φλις; Αφρός; Δέρμα; Λινό; Πλέγμα; Μέταλλο; Μικροΐνες; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Πολυεστέρας; Πολυουρεθάνη (PU); Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Καουτσούκ; Σατέν; Σιλικόνη; Μετάξι; Συνθετικό; Τουίντ; Βελούδο; Βινύλιο; Ξύλο; Μαλλί; Άλλο
pt-PT: Material de acessórios de roupas: Serapilheira; Tela; Algodão; Ganga; Peles sintéticas; Couro falso; Feltro; Velo; Espuma; Pele; Linho; Rede; Metal; Microfibra; Náilon; Plástico; Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Borracha; Acetinado; Silicone; Seda; Sintético; Tweed; Veludo; Vinil; Madeira; Lã; Outro
nl: Materiaal kledingaccessoire: Jute; Canvas; Katoen; Denim; Nepbont; Kunstleer; Vilt; Fleece; Schuim; Leer; Linnen; Gaas; Metaal; Microvezel; Nylon; Plastic; Polyester; Polyurethaan (PU); Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Rubber; Satijn; Siliconen; Zijde; Synthetisch; Tweed; Fluweel; Vinyl; Hout; Wol; Andere
zh-CN: 服装配饰材质: 粗麻布; 画布; 棉布; 牛仔布; 人造毛皮; 人造皮革; 毛毡; 羊毛; 泡沫; 皮革; 亚麻; 网状; 金属; 超细纤维; 尼龙; 塑料; 聚酯纤维; 聚氨酯 (PU); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 橡胶; 缎; 硅胶; 丝绸; 合成; 花呢; 天鹅绒; 乙烯基贴纸; 木头; 羊毛; 其他
sl-SI: Material modnih dodatkov: Žaklovina; Platno; Bombaž; Džins; Umetno krzno; Umetno usnje; Filc; Flis; Pena; Usnje; Lan; Mreža; Kovina; Mikrovlakna; Najlon; Plastika; Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Polivinilklorid (PVC); Guma; Saten; Silikon; Svila; Sintetika; Tvid; Žamet; Vinil; Les; Volna; Drugo